North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 1. Meetings.

§ 55-7-01.
Annual meeting.

A corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

Unless the board of directors determines to hold the meeting solely by means of remote communication in accordance with G.S. 55-7-09(c), annual shareholders’ meetings may be held (i) in or out of this State at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, or (ii) if no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, at the corporation’s principal office.

The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation’s bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action. Upon such failure, whether from lack of quorum or otherwise, a substitute annual meeting may be called in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 55-7-02

and any meeting so called may be designated as the annual meeting.

Any matter relating to the affairs of a corporation that is appropriate for shareholder action is a proper subject for action at an annual meeting of shareholders, and unless required by some provision of this Chapter, the matter need not be specifically stated in the notice of meeting.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 46, 49, 51; Rev., ss. 1179, 1188, 1190; C.S., ss. 1168, 1169, 1176; G.S., ss. 55-105, 55-106, 55-113; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, ss. 21, 22; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 44; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2021-162, s. 1(a).

§ 55-7-02.
Special meeting.

A corporation shall hold a special meeting of shareholders if either of the following applies:

On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

In the case of a corporation that is not a public corporation, within 30 days after the holders of at least ten percent (10%) of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting sign, date, and deliver to the corporation’s secretary one or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held. The written demand shall cease to be effective on the sixty-first day after the date of signature appearing on the demand unless prior to the sixty-first day the corporation has received effective written demands from holders sufficient to call the special meeting.

If not otherwise fixed under

G.S. 55-7-03

or

G.S. 55-7-07

, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting is the date the first shareholder signs the demand.

Unless the board of directors determines to hold the meeting solely by means of remote communication in accordance with G.S. 55-7-09(c), special shareholders’ meetings may be held (i) in or out of this State at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws or (ii) if no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, at the corporation’s principal office.

Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by G.S. 55-7-05(c) may be conducted at a special shareholders’ meeting.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 46, 49, 51; Rev., ss. 1179, 1188, 1190; C.S., ss. 1168, 1169, 1176; G.S., ss. 55-105, 55-106, 55-113; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, ss. 21, 22; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 44; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1991, c. 645, s. 17(a); 2001-201, s. 15; 2002-58, s. 1; 2021-162, s. 1(b).

§ 55-7-03.
Court-ordered meeting.

The superior court of the county where a corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this State, its registered office) is located may, after notice is given to the corporation, summarily order a meeting to be held:

On application of any shareholder if an annual meeting of the shareholders was not held within 15 months after the corporation’s last annual meeting; or

On application of a shareholder who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under

G.S. 55-7-02

, if the corporation does not proceed to hold the meeting as required by that section.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, determine the shares entitled to participate in the meeting, specify a record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting (or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters), enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting, and award such reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees, as it deems appropriate.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 46, 49, 51; Rev., ss. 1179, 1188, 1190; C.S., ss. 1168, 1169, 1176; G.S., ss. 55-105, 55-106, 55-113; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, ss. 21, 22; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 44; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1991, c. 645, s. 17(b).

§ 55-7-04.
Action without meeting.

Action required or permitted by this Chapter to be taken at a shareholders’ meeting may be taken without a meeting and without prior notice except as required by subsection (d) of this section, if the action is taken by all the shareholders entitled to vote on the action or, subject to subsection (a1) of this section, if so provided in the articles of incorporation of a corporation that is not a public corporation at the time the action is taken, by shareholders having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to take the action at a meeting at which all shareholders entitled to vote were present and voted. The action must be evidenced by one or more unrevoked written consents bearing the date of signature and signed by shareholders sufficient to take the action without a meeting, before or after such action, describing the action taken and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records. To the extent the corporation has agreed pursuant to

G.S. 55-1-50

, a shareholder’s consent to action taken without meeting or revocation thereof may be in electronic form and delivered by electronic means.

(a1)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the following actions may be taken without a meeting only by all the shareholders entitled to vote on the action:

If cumulative voting is not authorized, the election of directors at the annual meeting; or

If cumulative voting is authorized, the election of directors and the removal of a director unless the entire board of directors is to be removed, and if G.S. 55-7-28(e) applies to the corporation, an amendment to the articles of incorporation to deny or limit the right of shareholders to vote cumulatively and an amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws to decrease the number of directors.

A shareholder’s written consent to action to be taken without a meeting shall cease to be effective on the sixty-first day after the date of signature appearing on the consent unless prior to the sixty-first day the corporation has received unrevoked written consents sufficient under subsection (a) of this section to take the action without meeting. If not otherwise fixed under

G.S. 55-7-03

or

G.S. 55-7-07

, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to take action without a meeting is the earliest date of signature appearing on any consent that is to be counted in satisfying the requirements of subsection (a) of this section. A shareholder may only revoke a written consent if such shareholder delivers to the corporation a written revocation prior to the corporation’s receipt of unrevoked written consents sufficient under subsection (a) of this section to take the action.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

Unless the articles of incorporation otherwise provide, if shareholder approval is required by this Chapter for (i) an amendment to the articles of incorporation pursuant to Article 10 of this Chapter, (ii) a plan of merger or share exchange pursuant to Article 11 of this Chapter, (iii) a plan of conversion pursuant to Part 2 of Article 11A of this Chapter, (iv) the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the corporation’s property pursuant to Article 12 of this Chapter, or (v) a proposal for dissolution pursuant to Article 14 of this Chapter, and the approval is to be obtained through action without meeting, the corporation must give its shareholders, other than shareholders who consent to the action, written notice of the proposed action at least 10 days before the action is taken. The notice shall contain or be accompanied by the same material that, under this Chapter, would have been required to be sent to shareholders not entitled to vote on the action in a notice of meeting at which the proposed action would have been submitted to shareholders for action.

If action is taken without a meeting by fewer than all shareholders entitled to vote on the action, the corporation shall give written notice to all shareholders who have not consented to the action and who, if the action had been taken at a meeting, would have been entitled to notice of the meeting with the same record date as the action taken without a meeting, within 10 days after the action is taken. The notice shall describe the action and indicate that the action has been taken without a meeting of shareholders. Failure to comply with the requirements of this subsection shall not invalidate any action taken that otherwise complies with this section.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 33; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2001-387, s. 11; 2001-487, ss. 62(b), 62(c); 2005-268, ss. 2, 3.

§ 55-7-05.
Notice of meeting.

A corporation shall notify shareholders of the date, time, and place, if any, of each annual and special shareholders’ meeting no fewer than 10 nor more than 60 days before the meeting date. If the board of directors has authorized participation by means of remote communication pursuant to

G.S. 55-7-09

for any class or series of shareholders, the notice to such class or series of shareholders shall describe the means of remote communication to be used. Unless this Chapter or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, the corporation is required to give notice only to shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting.

Unless this Chapter or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, notice of an annual meeting need not include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

Notice of a special meeting must include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

If not otherwise fixed under

G.S. 55-7-03

or

G.S. 55-7-07

, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at an annual or special shareholders’ meeting is the close of business on the day before the first notice is delivered to shareholders.

Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual or special shareholders’ meeting is adjourned to a different date, time, or place, if any, notice need not be given of the new date, time, or place, if any, if the following are announced at the meeting before adjournment:

The new date, time, or place, if any.

If the meeting is to be continued solely by means of remote communication, a description of the means of remote communication.If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under

G.S. 55-7-07

, however, notice of the adjourned meeting must be given under this section to persons who are shareholders as of the new record date.

After a public corporation has notified shareholders of the date, time, and place of an annual or special shareholders’ meeting in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, further notification in accordance with subsection (a) of this section is not required if all of the following apply:

A governmental order restricting travel or group gatherings applicable to the place of the shareholders’ meeting or public corporation’s principal office is in effect and is anticipated in good faith by the board of directors to be in effect at the date and time set forth in the initial notification, including by an anticipated extension of an existing order.

The public corporation’s board of directors determines that the shareholders’ meeting is instead to be held solely by means of remote communication in accordance with G.S. 55-7-09(c) at the same date and time set forth in the initial notification or at a different date and time.

The public corporation (i) promptly issues a press release for national dissemination announcing the determination of its board of directors that the shareholders’ meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication and describing the means of remote communication to be used and providing the date and time of the shareholders’ meeting to be held solely by means of remote communication and (ii) files the press release with the Securities and Exchange Commission as close to the time the press release is issued as practicable and approximately contemporaneously posts such press release to its corporate website.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2013-153, s. 3; 2021-162, s. 1(c).

§ 55-7-06.
Waiver of notice.

A shareholder may waive any notice required by this Chapter, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver must be in writing, be signed by the shareholder entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

A shareholder’s attendance at a meeting:

Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting;

Waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter before it is voted upon.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-7-07.
Record date.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing the record date for one or more voting groups in order to determine the shareholders entitled to notice of a shareholders’ meeting, to demand a special meeting, to vote, or to take any other action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors of the corporation may fix a future date as the record date.

A record date fixed under this section may not be more than 70 days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of shareholders.

A determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a shareholders’ meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new record date, which it must do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than 120 days after the date fixed for the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than 120 days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date continues in effect or it may fix a new record date.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1973, c. 469, s. 45.1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-7-08.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-153, s. 4, effective January 1, 2014.

History.

2001-387, s. 12; repealed by 2013-513, s. 4, effective January 1, 2014.

§ 55-7-09.
Remote participation in meetings; meetings held solely by remote participation.

To the extent authorized by a corporation’s board of directors, shareholders of any class or series designated by the board of directors may participate in any meeting of shareholders by means of remote communication. Participation by means of remote communication shall be subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors adopts and shall be in conformity with subsection (b) of this section.

Shareholders participating in a shareholders’ meeting by means of remote communication are deemed present and may vote at the meeting if the corporation has implemented reasonable measures to do all of the following:

Verify that each person participating remotely is a shareholder.

Provide each shareholder participating remotely a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the shareholders, including an opportunity to communicate and read or hear the proceedings of the meeting, substantially concurrently with such proceedings.

Unless shareholders’ meetings held solely by means of remote communication are prohibited by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, the board of directors may, in its sole discretion, determine that any meeting of shareholders shall not be held at any place and shall instead be held solely by means of remote communication, but only if the corporation implements the measures specified in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

2013-153, s. 5; 2021-162, s. 1(d).

OFFICIAL COMMENTS (2013)

Section 7.09 permits shareholders to participate in annual and special shareholder meetings by means of remote communication, such as over the Internet or through telephone conference calls, subject to the conditions set forth in section 7.09(b) and any other guidelines and procedures that the board of directors adopts. This would include the use of electronic ballots to the extent authorized by the board of directors. This authorization extends as well to anyone to whom such shareholder has granted a proxy. Section 7.09 does not eliminate the requirement that corporations hold meetings at a physical location. See sections 7.01 and 7.02. Section 7.09 expressly provides that participation by remote means is permitted only if it is authorized by the board of directors. This limitation is meant to ensure that the board of directors has the sole discretion to determine whether to allow shareholders to participate by means of remote communication. Thus, a corporation may not be compelled to allow such participation either through amendments to the bylaws, shareholder resolutions, or otherwise.

Section 7.09 allows the board of director s to limit participation by means of remote communication to all share holders of a particular class or series, but does not permit the board of directors to limit such participation to particular shareholders within a class or series.

Section 7.09 requires the board of directors to implement certain procedures when allowing shareholder participation by means of remote communication. First, the board of directors must create reasonable measures for verifying those entitled to vote. Second, the board of directors must institute reasonable measures to ensure that all shareholders and their proxies within the authorized class or series have the opportunity to participate in the meeting, including measures that provide them with an opportunity to communicate with management and other shareholders present at the meeting, and to read or hear the proceedings. While this provision is aimed at approximating as much as possible shareholder participation in person or by proxy, including interacting with management during the meeting, it does not require that all can so participate and interact. In addition, Section 7.09 is not intended to expand the rights to participate in meetings or otherwise alter the ability of the board of directors or the chair to conduct meetings pursuant to section 7.08 in a manner that is fair and orderly. For example, many corporations limit or cut-off shareholder comments and, if such practice is fair to shareholders consistent with
section 7.08, such practice is not changed by section 7.09. The two requirements under section 7.09(b) reflect the minimum deemed necessary to safeguard the integrity of the shareholders’ meeting. Section 7.09 specifically gives the board of directors the flexibility and discretion to adopt additional guidelines and procedures for allowing shareholders to participate in a meeting by means of remote communication.

In order to give corporations the flexibility to choose the most efficient means of remote communication, the board may require that shareholders communicate their desire to participate by a certain date and condition the provision of remote communication or the form of communication to be used on the affirmative response of a certain number or proportion of shareholders eligible to participate. If the board of directors authorizes shareholder participation by means of remote communication pursuant to this section, such authorization and the process for participating by remote means of communication, must be included in the meeting notice required by section 7.05.

§§ 55-7-10 through 55-7-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.